Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,208
Local safety standards; authorized.

The governing board of any city, county, or village may establish and enforce safety standards for amusement rides in addition to, but not in conflict with, the standards established by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1819;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 44.